Utah statutes.
7-8-3 (Superseded 07/01/12).   Organization -- Authorization to conduct business -- Deposit insurance.

(1)  Subject to Subsection (4), the commissioner may authorize a person described in Subsection (2) to conduct business as an industrial bank.

(2) (a)  Each person organized to conduct the business of an industrial bank in this state shall be organized under:

(i)  Title 16, Chapter 10a, Utah Revised Business Corporation Act; or

(ii)  in accordance with Section 7-1-810, Title 48, Chapter 2c, Utah Revised Limited Liability Company Act.

(b)  A person may not conduct business as an industrial bank authorized under this chapter to conduct business as an industrial bank in any form of entity other than those provided in Subsection (2)(a).

(3) (a)  All rights, privileges, powers, duties, and obligations of a corporation authorized to conduct business as an industrial bank and its officers, directors, and stockholders shall be governed by Title 16, Chapter 10a, Utah Revised Business Corporation Act, except as otherwise provided in this title.

(b)  All rights, privileges, powers, duties, and obligations of a limited liability company authorized to conduct business as an industrial bank and its members and managers shall be governed by Title 48, Chapter 2c, Utah Revised Limited Liability Company Act, except as otherwise provided in this title.

(4) (a)  An industrial bank is authorized to receive and hold deposits.

(b)  An industrial bank may not conduct business under this chapter as an industrial bank unless the industrial bank obtains insurance from the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or a successor federal deposit insurance entity for any deposits received or held by the industrial bank.

